Massachusetts, session 194th, H1555.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 183A of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:- 
Section 24. (a) For the purposes of this section, the term `flag of the United States' has the 
meaning given the term `flag, standard, colors, or ensign' under section 3 of title 4 of the United 
States Code. 
(b) No corporation, trust or unincorporated association provided for in the master deed 
for the management and regulation of a condominium shall prohibit a unit owner from: (i) flying 
or displaying the flag of the United States on a flagpole, base or stand affixed to the unit in a 
limited common area where the unit owner has a right of exclusive possession or use; or from (ii) 
displaying an official flag of the United States Armed Forces or a Prisoner of War/Missing in 

of 2 10 Action flag in a window of the unit; provided, that any such flag shall be no larger than 4.5 feet 
by 6 feet in size; provided, further, that the display or use is not inconsistent with any provision 
of chapter 1 of title 4 of the United States Code, or any rule or custom pertaining to the proper 
display or use of the flag of the United States; and provided, further, that such flag does not 
obstruct the sightlines of other unit owners and is not erected within or upon an easement 
restricting or prohibiting such erection and display of the flag. 
(c) No corporation, trust or unincorporated association provided for in the master deed for 
the management and regulation of a condominium shall enter into an agreement with a unit 
owner that would restrict or impair their right to display the flag of the United States or of the 
United States Armed Forces, or Prisoner of War/Missing in Action pursuant to this section.